test/src/gt-norm-yamls/proper_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Bådåddjo

Tests:
  Propernoun - Bådåddjo: # MARJA-plc
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Bådåddjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Bådådjov
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Bådådjon
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Bådåddjuj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Bådådjos
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: [Bådådjujn, Bådådjojn]
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Bådådjojda
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Bådåddjon
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: bådåddjolasj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: bådådjok

  Propernoun - Europaráde: # MARJA-org
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom: Europaráde
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen: Europaráde
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc: Europarádev
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine: Europaráden
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill: Europarádáj
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela: Europarádes
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com: Europarádijn
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess: Europaráden
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Tiensjanváre: # VARGGAT-plc
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: []
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Tiensjanváre
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Gen: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Acc: Tiensjanvárijt
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ine: Tiensjanvárijn
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Tiensjanvárijda
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ela: Tiensjanvárijs
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Com: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Tiensjanvárren
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: tiensjanvárrelasj
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: tiensjanvárek

  Propernoun - Kuoljok: # LONDON-sur
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Nom: Kuoljok
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen: Kuoljoga
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Acc: Kuoljogav
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ine: Kuoljogin
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ill: Kuoljogij
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Ela: Kuoljogis
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Com: Kuoljogijn
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Nom: Kuoljoga
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Pl+Ill: Kuoljogijda
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Ess: Kuoljogin
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sem/Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Njávisj: # LONDON-ani
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: Njávisj
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: Njávitjav
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: Njávitjij
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: Njávitjis
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: Njávitjijn
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ill: Njávitjijda
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ievár: # LONDON-mal
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ievár
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Ievárav
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ievárij
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Ieváris
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Ievárijn
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Ievárijda
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ievár+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Abmut: # LONDON-mal
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Abmut
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Abmuda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Abmudav
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Abmudin
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Abmudij
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Abmudis
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Abmudijn
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Abmuda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Abmudijda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Abmudin
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Abmut+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Kárin: # LONDON-fem
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Kárin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Kárinav
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Kárinij
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Kárinis
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Kárinijn
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Kárinijda
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Kárin+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Adélieednam: # LONDON-plc
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Adélieednam
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Adélieednamav
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Adélieednamij
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Adélieednamis
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Adélieednamijn
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Adélieednamijda
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: adélieednamlasj
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Eurohpá% Åvtåstus: # BASUDIS-org
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstus'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstusá'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Acc': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstusáv'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ine': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstusán'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstussaj'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstusás'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Com': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstusájn'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Nom': []
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Pl+Ill': []
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Ess': 'Eurohpá Åvtåstussan'
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom': []
    'Eurohpá Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom': []

  Propernoun - Ánndaris: # BASUDIS-mal
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Ánndaris
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Ánndarisáv
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Ánndarisán
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánndarissaj
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Ánndarisás
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Ánndarisájn
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Ánndarisájda
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Ánndarissan
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Magdalas: # BASUDIS-fem
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Magdalas
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Magdalasá
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Magdalasáv
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Magdalasán
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Magdalassaj
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Magdalasás
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Magdalasájn
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Magdalasá
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Magdalasájda
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Magdalassan
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Listárjjus: # LONDON-mal
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Listárjjus
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Listárjjusav
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Listárjjusij
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Listárjjusis
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Listárjjusijn
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Listárjjusijda
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ulldevis: # BASUDIS-plc
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Ulldevis
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Ulldevisáv
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Ulldevisán
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Ulldevissaj
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Ulldevisás
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Ulldevisájn
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Ulldevisájda
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Ulldevissan
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: ulldevisák

  Propernoun - Adriamerra: # MARJA-plc
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Adriamerra
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc: Adriamerav
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ine: Adriameran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill: Adriamerraj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela: Adriameras
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Com: Adriamerajn
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill: Adriamerajda
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Ess: Adriamerran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: adriamerralasj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: adriamerak

  Propernoun - Gáddjá: # MARJA-fem
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom: Gáddjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Acc: Gádjáv
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ine: Gádján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill: Gáddjáj
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela: Gádjás
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Com: Gádjájn
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Nom: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Pl+Ill: Gádjájda
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Ess: Gáddján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Mumistállo: # MARJA-ani
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: Mumistállo
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen: Mumistálo
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Acc: Mumistálov
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ine: Mumistálon
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill: Mumistálluj
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela: Mumistálos
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Com: [Mumistálujn, Mumistálojn]
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Nom: Mumistálo
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Pl+Ill: Mumistálojda
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Ess: Mumistállon
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Máhttu: # MARJA-mal
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom: Máhttu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc: Máhtuv
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ine: Máhtun
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill: Máhttuj
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela: Máhtus
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com: Máhtujn
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Nom: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Pl+Ill: Máhtujda
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Ess: Máhttun
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der/lasj+N+Sg+Nom: []
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
